Delaware, session 153, HB154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 68, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Subchapter VIII. Immunity for Distribution of Secure Gun Storage or Safety Devices Â§ 6860. Definition. For purposes of this subchapter, âsecure gun storage or safety deviceâ means as defined by 18 U.S.C. Â§ 921(a)(34). A âsecure gun storage or safety deviceâ includes cable locks, trigger locks, or gun safes. Â§ 6861. Distribution of secure gun storage or safety devices. (a) A tax-exempt nonprofit organization or a law enforcement agency that distributes a new secure gun storage or safety device free of charge to an individual is not liable for civil damages arising out of any injury to person or property proximately caused by an alleged defect in the design, manufacturing, maintenance, or operation of the secure gun storage or safety device. (b) Subsection (a) of this section only applies where the tax-exempt nonprofit organization or the law enforcement agency does all of the following: (1) Distributes the secure gun storage or safety device in its original packaging and unopened. (2) Provides to the recipient of the secure gun storage or safety device an information pamphlet about gun safety developed by a local or national gun safety organization or hospital. (c) Nothing in this section is intended to limit any liability on the part of a manufacturer, distributor, or retailer of the secure gun storage or safety device.